Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 71A.20.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 30 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in ((subsection))subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the following residential habilitation centers are permanently established to provide services to persons with developmental disabilities: Lakeland Village, located at Medical Lake, Spokane county; Rainier School, located at Buckley, Pierce county; Yakima Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county; and Fircrest School, located at Seattle, King county.(2) The Yakima Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county, shall cease to operate as a residential habilitation center when the conditions in RCW ((71A.20.180(2)(b)))71A.20.180(1)(a) are met.(3) The Rainier school, located at Buckley, Pierce county shall cease to operate as a residential habilitation center when the conditions in section 2(5) of this act are met.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, as of the effective date of this section, no new long-term admissions are permitted at the Rainier school, located at Buckley, Pierce county.(b) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, as of June 30, 2027, no admissions of any kind are permitted at the Rainier school, located at Buckley, Pierce county.(2) Until the conditions in subsection (5) of this section are met, a former long-term resident of the Rainier school who moves to a community-based setting after the effective date of this section shall be offered the right to return to the Rainier school once during the first year following their move to the community and this shall not be considered a new admission for purposes of subsection (1) of this section. If a former resident of the Rainier school exercises the right to return established in this subsection (2), any additional request to return to the Rainier school after a second move to the community shall be reviewed by the department and must be approved by the secretary, based on the recommendation from a multidisciplinary care team. In addition to the right to return established in this subsection (2), any former resident of the Rainier school maintains the right to return to a residential habilitation center established in RCW 71A.18.040 and the right to residential habilitation center services when determined eligible.(3)(a) The department shall:(i) Provide state-operated living alternatives to residential habilitation center residents transitioning to the community from the Rainier school who prefer a state-operated community residential service;(ii) Use supported living program and adult family home capacity in the community for residents of the Rainier school who prefer and choose these settings;(iii) Provide space at other residential habilitation centers to residents of the Rainier school who prefer a different residential habilitation center setting; and(iv) Offer employees of the Rainier school opportunities to work in state-operated living alternatives and other state facilities and programs.(b) Sufficient funding shall be appropriated to the department to fulfill the requirements of this subsection (3).(4) When assisting individuals who are transitioning out of the Rainier school the department shall:(a) Offer each individual resident a meaningful choice of appropriate alternative placements;(b) Prioritize client choice, autonomy, individual preferences, medical and behavioral health care needs, and opportunities for community integration;(c) Develop individualized transition plans in collaboration with each resident and their family or legal guardian, caregivers, and support providers;(d) Coordinate closely with other state agencies, local entities, health care providers, and community stakeholders to ensure seamless transitions;(e) Provide or contract for all necessary assessments, planning, relocation expenses, housing modifications, staff training, crisis support, and related transition activities; and(f) Implement robust oversight and accountability measures related to the transitions, and regularly monitor transition outcomes, as well as individual well-being and satisfaction.(5) The Rainier school, located at Buckley, Pierce county shall continue to operate as a residential habilitation center until such time that the census of long-term residents has reached zero persons.(6) "Closure" for purposes of this act means prohibiting new admissions as described in subsection (1) of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The department of social and health services shall, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on December 1, 2025, June 1, 2026, December 1, 2026, June 1, 2027, June 1, 2028, and annually thereafter that provides the information described in subsection (2) of this section.(2) The report required under subsection (1) of this section must include the following:(a) A point in time description of the capacity for all residential settings for clients of the developmental disabilities administration within the department of social and health services;(b) The number of former residents who have transitioned out of the Rainier school after the effective date of this section and the type of setting that the person transitioned to, including additional transitions from the initial placement;(c) The number of deaths of former residents who have transitioned out of the Rainier school after the effective date of this section and into other residential settings supported by the developmental disabilities administration;(d) The geographic distribution of residential placements across all existing residential placements for clients of the developmental disabilities administration within the department of social and health services; and(e) Information regarding former Rainier school employees who have transitioned to other state employment, left the industry, or transitioned to private sector employment after the effective date of this section.(3) This section expires July 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 43.382 RCW to read as follows:(1) By November 1, 2028, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the developmental disability ombuds shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that includes summaries of resident, parent, and guardian feedback regarding transition of residents out of the Rainier school following the effective date of this section.(2) This section expires July 1, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. The department of social and health services shall, within available funds, hold a public comment period to solicit feedback for the purpose of identifying strategies to mitigate the impact of the closure described in section 2 of this act on the communities that are most directly affected. The public comment period must be at least 90 days and must conclude no later than November 1, 2025.--- END ---